North Carolina, session 2025, SB604.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Article 8C of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-105.70. School resource officer.
(a) A school resource officer is any law enforcement officer assigned to one or more
public schools within a public school unit for at least 20 hours per week for more than 12 weeks
per calendar year to assist with all of the following, consistent with any written memorandum of
understanding between the public school unit and the law enforcement agency governing the
school resource officer:
(1) School safety.
(2) School security.
(3) Emergency preparedness.
(4) Emergency response.
(5) Any additional responsibilities related to school safety or security assigned by
the officer's employer while the officer is acting as a school resource officer.
(b) All school resource officers shall comply with initial training standards, as established
by subsection (c) of this section, within one year of being assigned as a school resource officer.
After initial training, all school resource officers shall comply with continuing education
standards, as established by subsection (c) of this section.
(c) The North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards Commission
and the North Carolina Sheriffs' Education and Training Standards Commission, in collaboration
with the Center for Safer Schools, shall establish initial training and continuing education
standards for school resource officers. These standards shall, at a minimum, include training on
the following topics: mental health, students with disabilities, racial equity, and crisis
intervention and de-escalation."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 17C-6(a) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(23) Establish initial training and continuing education training standards for
school resource officers, as set forth in G.S. 115C-105.70."
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 17E-4(a) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
*S604-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"(19) Establish initial training and continuing education training standards for
school resource officers, as set forth in G.S. 115C-105.70."
SECTION 1.(d) The North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training
Standards Commission and the North Carolina Sheriffs' Education and Training Standards
Commission shall establish initial training standards for school resource officers no later than
January 15, 2026.
SECTION 1.(e) Subsection (a) of this section applies to school resource officers
assigned on or after January 1, 2026. All school resource officers assigned before January 1,
2026, shall complete initial training no later than December 31, 2026.
SECTION 2.(a) Article 18 of Chapter 7B of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 7B-1802A. School-based complaints.
A school-based complaint in which delinquency is alleged to have occurred initiated by a
school resource officer, as defined in G.S. 115C-105.70, shall be signed by a school administrator
or school social worker prior to being referred in accordance with G.S. 7B-1803 or filed in a
court of competent jurisdiction. For the purposes of this section, "a school-based complaint"
means a complaint in which delinquency is alleged to have occurred on school grounds, school
property, at a school bus stop, or at an off-campus school-sanctioned event, or whose victim is
identified as a school."
SECTION 2.(b) This section becomes effective on January 1, 2026, and applies to
school-based complaints initiated on or after that date by school resource officers.
SECTION 3. Except where otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 604-First Edition